Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.202

Individuals not competent to stand trial and not restorable.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Following a competency evaluation under RCW 10.77.060, individuals who are found not competent to stand trial and not restorable due to an intellectual or developmental disability, dementia, or traumatic brain injury, shall not be referred for competency restoration services.

(2) The department shall develop a process for connecting individuals who have been found not competent to stand trial due to an intellectual or developmental disability, dementia, or traumatic brain injury to available wraparound services and supports in community-based settings, which may include residential supports. The process shall include provisions for individuals who are current clients of the department's developmental disabilities administration or aging and long-term support administration and for individuals who are not current clients of the department.

(a) For current clients of the developmental disabilities administration and aging and long-term support administration, the department's assigned case manager shall:

(i) Coordinate with the individual's services providers to determine if the individual can return to the same or like services, or determine appropriate new community-based services. This shall include updating the individual's service plan and identifying and coordinating potential funding for any additional supports to stabilize the individual in community-based settings funded by the developmental disabilities administration or aging and long-term support administration so that the individual does not lose existing services, including submitting any exceptions to rule for additional services;

(ii) Conduct a current service eligibility assessment and send referral packets to all community-based service providers for services for which the individual is eligible; and

(iii) Connect with the individual's assigned forensic navigator and determine if the individual is eligible for any diversion, supportive housing, or case management programs as a Trueblood class member, and assist the individual to access these services.

(b) For individuals who have not established eligibility for the department's support services, the department shall:

(i) Conduct an eligibility determination for services and send referral packets to service providers for all relevant community-based services for which the individual is eligible. This process must include identifying and coordinating funding for any additional supports that are needed to stabilize the individual in any community-based setting funded by the developmental disabilities administration or aging and long-term support administration, including submitting any necessary exceptions to rule for additional services; and

(ii) Connect with the individual's assigned forensic navigator and determine if the individual is eligible for any diversion, supportive housing, or case management programs as a Trueblood class member, if additional specialized services are available to supplement diversion program services, and assist the individual to access these services.

(3) The department shall offer to transition the individual in services either directly from the jail or as soon thereafter as may be practicable, without maintaining the individual at an inpatient facility for longer than is clinically necessary. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the department from returning the individual to their home or to another less restrictive setting if such setting is appropriate, which may include provision of supportive services to help the person maintain stability. The individual is not required to accept developmental disabilities administration, aging and long-term support administration, or other diversionary services as a condition of having the individual's criminal case dismissed without prejudice, provided the individual meets the criteria of subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall develop a program for individuals who have been involved with the criminal justice system and who have been found under RCW 10.77.084 as incompetent to stand trial due to an intellectual or developmental disability, traumatic brain injury, or dementia and who do not meet criteria under other programs in this section. The program must involve wraparound services and housing supports appropriate to the needs of the individual. It is sufficient to meet the criteria for participation in this program if the individual has recently been the subject of criminal charges and was found incompetent to stand trial due to an intellectual or developmental disability, traumatic brain injury, or dementia.

[ 2023 c 453 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 453 s 13: "Section 13 of this act takes effect December 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 453 s 31.]

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.